Illinois, session 104th, HB2613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Sections 2 and 8 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 418)7    Sec. 2. A tax is imposed on the privilege of operating 8motor vehicles upon the public highways and recreational-type 9watercraft upon the waters of this State.10    (a) Prior to August 1, 1989, the tax is imposed at the rate 11of 13 cents per gallon on all motor fuel used in motor vehicles 12operating on the public highways and recreational type 13watercraft operating upon the waters of this State. Beginning 14on August 1, 1989 and until January 1, 1990, the rate of the 15tax imposed in this paragraph shall be 16 cents per gallon. 16Beginning January 1, 1990 and until July 1, 2019, the rate of 17tax imposed in this paragraph, including the tax on compressed 18natural gas, shall be 19 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 192019 and until July 1, 2020, the rate of tax imposed in this 20paragraph shall be 38 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 2020 21and until July 1, 2021, the rate of tax imposed in this 22paragraph shall be 38.7 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 232021 and until January 1, 2023, the rate of tax imposed in this   HB2613- 2 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1paragraph shall be 39.2 cents per gallon. On January 1, 2023 2and until July 1, 2025, the rate of tax imposed in this 3paragraph shall be increased by an amount equal to the 4percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for 5the 12 months ending in September of 2022. Beginning on July 1, 62025, the rate of tax imposed in this paragraph, including the 7tax on compressed natural gas, shall be $0.19 per gallon. On 8July 1, 2023, and on July 1 of each subsequent year, the rate 9of tax imposed in this paragraph shall be increased by an 10amount equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the 11Consumer Price Index for the 12 months ending in March of the 12year in which the increase takes place. The percentage 13increase in the Consumer Price Index shall be calculated as 14follows: (1) calculate the average Consumer Price Index for 15the full 12 months ending in March of the year in which the 16increase takes place; (2) calculate the average Consumer Price 17Index for the full 12 months ending in March of the year 18immediately preceding the year in which the increase takes 19place; (3) calculate the percentage increase, if any, in the 20current-year average determined under item (1) over the 21preceding-year average determined under item (2). The rate 22shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one cent. 23    (a-5) Beginning on July 1, 2022 and through December 31, 242022, each retailer of motor fuel shall cause the following 25notice to be posted in a prominently visible place on each 26retail dispensing device that is used to dispense motor fuel   HB2613- 3 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1in the State of Illinois: "As of July 1, 2022, the State of 2Illinois has suspended the inflation adjustment to the motor 3fuel tax through December 31, 2022. The price on this pump 4should reflect the suspension of the tax increase." The notice 5shall be printed in bold print on a sign that is no smaller 6than 4 inches by 8 inches. The sign shall be clearly visible to 7customers. Any retailer who fails to post or maintain a 8required sign through December 31, 2022 is guilty of a petty 9offense for which the fine shall be $500 per day per each 10retail premises where a violation occurs. 11    (b) Until July 1, 2019 and beginning again on July 1, 2025, 12the tax on the privilege of operating motor vehicles which use 13diesel fuel, liquefied natural gas, or propane shall be the 14rate according to paragraph (a) plus an additional 2 1/2 cents 15per gallon. Beginning July 1, 2019 and until July 1, 2025, the 16tax on the privilege of operating motor vehicles which use 17diesel fuel, liquefied natural gas, or propane shall be the 18rate according to subsection (a) plus an additional 7.5 cents 19per gallon. "Diesel fuel" is defined as any product intended 20for use or offered for sale as a fuel for engines in which the 21fuel is injected into the combustion chamber and ignited by 22pressure without electric spark.23    (c) A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging in the 24business of selling motor fuel as a retailer or reseller on all 25motor fuel used in motor vehicles operating on the public 26highways and recreational type watercraft operating upon the   HB2613- 4 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1waters of this State: (1) at the rate of 3 cents per gallon on 2motor fuel owned or possessed by such retailer or reseller at 312:01 a.m. on August 1, 1989; and (2) at the rate of 3 cents 4per gallon on motor fuel owned or possessed by such retailer or 5reseller at 12:01 A.M. on January 1, 1990.6    Retailers and resellers who are subject to this additional 7tax shall be required to inventory such motor fuel and pay this 8additional tax in a manner prescribed by the Department of 9Revenue.10    The tax imposed in this paragraph (c) shall be in addition 11to all other taxes imposed by the State of Illinois or any unit 12of local government in this State.13    (d) Except as provided in Section 2a, the collection of a 14tax based on gallonage of gasoline used for the propulsion of 15any aircraft is prohibited on and after October 1, 1979, and 16the collection of a tax based on gallonage of special fuel used 17for the propulsion of any aircraft is prohibited on and after 18December 1, 2019.19    (e) The collection of a tax, based on gallonage of all 20products commonly or commercially known or sold as 1-K 21kerosene, regardless of its classification or uses, is 22prohibited (i) on and after July 1, 1992 until December 31, 231999, except when the 1-K kerosene is either: (1) delivered 24into bulk storage facilities of a bulk user, or (2) delivered 25directly into the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles and (ii) 26on and after January 1, 2000. Beginning on January 1, 2000, the   HB2613- 5 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1collection of a tax, based on gallonage of all products 2commonly or commercially known or sold as 1-K kerosene, 3regardless of its classification or uses, is prohibited except 4when the 1-K kerosene is delivered directly into a storage 5tank that is located at a facility that has withdrawal 6facilities that are readily accessible to and are capable of 7dispensing 1-K kerosene into the fuel supply tanks of motor 8vehicles. For purposes of this subsection (e), a facility is 9considered to have withdrawal facilities that are not "readily 10accessible to and capable of dispensing 1-K kerosene into the 11fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles" only if the 1-K kerosene 12is delivered from: (i) a dispenser hose that is short enough so 13that it will not reach the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle 14or (ii) a dispenser that is enclosed by a fence or other 15physical barrier so that a vehicle cannot pull alongside the 16dispenser to permit fueling. 17    Any person who sells or uses 1-K kerosene for use in motor 18vehicles upon which the tax imposed by this Law has not been 19paid shall be liable for any tax due on the sales or use of 1-K 20kerosene.21    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index" means the 22index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 23United States Department of Labor that measures the average 24change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 25consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 26100.   HB2613- 6 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24.) 2    (35 ILCS 505/8)  (from Ch. 120, par. 424)3    Sec. 8. Distribution of proceeds of tax. Except as 4provided in subsection (a-1) of this Section, Section 8a, 5subdivision (h)(1) of Section 12a, Section 13a.6, and items 613, 14, 15, and 16 of Section 15, all money received by the 7Department under this Act, including payments made to the 8Department by member jurisdictions participating in the 9International Fuel Tax Agreement, shall be deposited into a 10special fund in the State treasury, to be known as the Motor 11Fuel Tax Fund, and shall be used as follows:12    (a) 2 1/2 cents per gallon of the tax collected on special 13fuel under paragraph (b) of Section 2 and Section 13a of this 14Act shall be transferred to the State Construction Account 15Fund in the State Treasury; the remainder of the tax collected 16on special fuel under paragraph (b) of Section 2 and Section 1713a of this Act shall be deposited into the Road Fund;18    (a-1) Beginning on July 1, 2019 and until July 1, 2025, an 19amount equal to the amount of tax collected under subsection 20(a) of Section 2 and Section 13a as a result of the increase in 21the tax rate under subsection (a) of Section 2 authorized by 22Public Act 101-32 shall be deposited each month into the 23Transportation Renewal Fund; provided, however, that the 24amount that represents the part (b) portion of the rate under 25Section 13a shall be deposited each month into the Motor Fuel   HB2613- 7 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1Tax Fund and the Transportation Renewal Fund in the same 2proportion as the amount collected under subsection (a) of 3Section 2; 4    (b) $420,000 shall be transferred each month to the State 5Boating Act Fund to be used by the Department of Natural 6Resources for the purposes specified in Article X of the Boat 7Registration and Safety Act;8    (c) $3,500,000 shall be transferred each month to the 9Grade Crossing Protection Fund to be used as follows: not less 10than $12,000,000 each fiscal year shall be used for the 11construction or reconstruction of rail highway grade 12separation structures; $5,500,000 in fiscal year 2022 and each 13fiscal year thereafter shall be transferred to the 14Transportation Regulatory Fund and shall be used to pay the 15cost of administration of the Illinois Commerce Commission's 16railroad safety program in connection with its duties under 17subsection (3) of Section 18c-7401 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code, with the remainder to be used by the Department of 19Transportation upon order of the Illinois Commerce Commission, 20to pay that part of the cost apportioned by such Commission to 21the State to cover the interest of the public in the use of 22highways, roads, streets, or pedestrian walkways in the county 23highway system, township and district road system, or 24municipal street system as defined in the Illinois Highway 25Code, as the same may from time to time be amended, for 26separation of grades, for installation, construction or   HB2613- 8 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1reconstruction of crossing protection or reconstruction, 2alteration, relocation including construction or improvement 3of any existing highway necessary for access to property or 4improvement of any grade crossing and grade crossing surface 5including the necessary highway approaches thereto of any 6railroad across the highway or public road, or for the 7installation, construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of 8safety treatments to deter trespassing or a pedestrian walkway 9over or under a railroad right-of-way, as provided for in and 10in accordance with Section 18c-7401 of the Illinois Vehicle 11Code. The Commission may order up to $2,000,000 per year in 12Grade Crossing Protection Fund moneys for the improvement of 13grade crossing surfaces and up to $300,000 per year for the 14maintenance and renewal of 4-quadrant gate vehicle detection 15systems located at non-high speed rail grade crossings. In 16entering orders for projects for which payments from the Grade 17Crossing Protection Fund will be made, the Commission shall 18account for expenditures authorized by the orders on a cash 19rather than an accrual basis. For purposes of this requirement 20an "accrual basis" assumes that the total cost of the project 21is expended in the fiscal year in which the order is entered, 22while a "cash basis" allocates the cost of the project among 23fiscal years as expenditures are actually made. To meet the 24requirements of this subsection, the Illinois Commerce 25Commission shall develop annual and 5-year project plans of 26rail crossing capital improvements that will be paid for with   HB2613- 9 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1moneys from the Grade Crossing Protection Fund. The annual 2project plan shall identify projects for the succeeding fiscal 3year and the 5-year project plan shall identify projects for 4the 5 directly succeeding fiscal years. The Commission shall 5submit the annual and 5-year project plans for this Fund to the 6Governor, the President of the Senate, the Senate Minority 7Leader, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the 8Minority Leader of the House of Representatives on the first 9Wednesday in April of each year;10    (d) of the amount remaining after allocations provided for 11in subsections (a), (a-1), (b), and (c), a sufficient amount 12shall be reserved to pay all of the following:13        (1) the costs of the Department of Revenue in 14    administering this Act;15        (2) the costs of the Department of Transportation in 16    performing its duties imposed by the Illinois Highway Code 17    for supervising the use of motor fuel tax funds 18    apportioned to municipalities, counties and road 19    districts;20        (3) refunds provided for in Section 13, refunds for 21    overpayment of decal fees paid under Section 13a.4 of this 22    Act, and refunds provided for under the terms of the 23    International Fuel Tax Agreement referenced in Section 24    14a;25        (4) from October 1, 1985 until June 30, 1994, the 26    administration of the Vehicle Emissions Inspection Law,   HB2613- 10 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1    which amount shall be certified monthly by the 2    Environmental Protection Agency to the State Comptroller 3    and shall promptly be transferred by the State Comptroller 4    and Treasurer from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund to the Vehicle 5    Inspection Fund, and for the period July 1, 1994 through 6    June 30, 2000, one-twelfth of $25,000,000 each month, for 7    the period July 1, 2000 through June 30, 2003, one-twelfth 8    of $30,000,000 each month, and $15,000,000 on July 1, 9    2003, and $15,000,000 on January 1, 2004, and $15,000,000 10    on each July 1 and October 1, or as soon thereafter as may 11    be practical, during the period July 1, 2004 through June 12    30, 2012, and $30,000,000 on June 1, 2013, or as soon 13    thereafter as may be practical, and $15,000,000 on July 1 14    and October 1, or as soon thereafter as may be practical, 15    during the period of July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2015, 16    for the administration of the Vehicle Emissions Inspection 17    Law of 2005, to be transferred by the State Comptroller 18    and Treasurer from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund into the 19    Vehicle Inspection Fund;20        (4.5) beginning on July 1, 2019, the costs of the 21    Environmental Protection Agency for the administration of 22    the Vehicle Emissions Inspection Law of 2005 shall be 23    paid, subject to appropriation, from the Motor Fuel Tax 24    Fund into the Vehicle Inspection Fund; beginning in 2019, 25    no later than December 31 of each year, or as soon 26    thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller shall   HB2613- 11 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1    direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer from the 2    Vehicle Inspection Fund to the Motor Fuel Tax Fund any 3    balance remaining in the Vehicle Inspection Fund in excess 4    of $2,000,000;5        (5) amounts ordered paid by the Court of Claims; and6        (6) payment of motor fuel use taxes due to member 7    jurisdictions under the terms of the International Fuel 8    Tax Agreement. The Department shall certify these amounts 9    to the Comptroller by the 15th day of each month; the 10    Comptroller shall cause orders to be drawn for such 11    amounts, and the Treasurer shall administer those amounts 12    on or before the last day of each month;13    (e) after allocations for the purposes set forth in 14subsections (a), (a-1), (b), (c), and (d), the remaining 15amount shall be apportioned as follows:16        (1) Until January 1, 2000, 58.4%, and beginning 17    January 1, 2000, 45.6% shall be deposited as follows:18            (A) 37% into the State Construction Account Fund, 19        and20            (B) 63% into the Road Fund, $1,250,000 of which 21        shall be reserved each month for the Department of 22        Transportation to be used in accordance with the 23        provisions of Sections 6-901 through 6-906 of the 24        Illinois Highway Code;25        (2) Until January 1, 2000, 41.6%, and beginning 26    January 1, 2000, 54.4% shall be transferred to the   HB2613- 12 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1    Department of Transportation to be distributed as follows:2            (A) 49.10% to the municipalities of the State,3            (B) 16.74% to the counties of the State having 4        1,000,000 or more inhabitants,5            (C) 18.27% to the counties of the State having 6        less than 1,000,000 inhabitants,7            (D) 15.89% to the road districts of the State.8        If a township is dissolved under Article 24 of the 9    Township Code, McHenry County shall receive any moneys 10    that would have been distributed to the township under 11    this subparagraph, except that a municipality that assumes 12    the powers and responsibilities of a road district under 13    paragraph (6) of Section 24-35 of the Township Code shall 14    receive any moneys that would have been distributed to the 15    township in a percent equal to the area of the dissolved 16    road district or portion of the dissolved road district 17    over which the municipality assumed the powers and 18    responsibilities compared to the total area of the 19    dissolved township. The moneys received under this 20    subparagraph shall be used in the geographic area of the 21    dissolved township. If a township is reconstituted as 22    provided under Section 24-45 of the Township Code, McHenry 23    County or a municipality shall no longer be distributed 24    moneys under this subparagraph.25    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 26Department of Transportation shall allot to each municipality   HB2613- 13 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1its share of the amount apportioned to the several 2municipalities which shall be in proportion to the population 3of such municipalities as determined by the last preceding 4municipal census if conducted by the Federal Government or 5Federal census. If territory is annexed to any municipality 6subsequent to the time of the last preceding census the 7corporate authorities of such municipality may cause a census 8to be taken of such annexed territory and the population so 9ascertained for such territory shall be added to the 10population of the municipality as determined by the last 11preceding census for the purpose of determining the allotment 12for that municipality. If the population of any municipality 13was not determined by the last Federal census preceding any 14apportionment, the apportionment to such municipality shall be 15in accordance with any census taken by such municipality. Any 16municipal census used in accordance with this Section shall be 17certified to the Department of Transportation by the clerk of 18such municipality, and the accuracy thereof shall be subject 19to approval of the Department which may make such corrections 20as it ascertains to be necessary.21    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 22Department of Transportation shall allot to each county its 23share of the amount apportioned to the several counties of the 24State as herein provided. Each allotment to the several 25counties having less than 1,000,000 inhabitants shall be in 26proportion to the amount of motor vehicle license fees   HB2613- 14 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1received from the residents of such counties, respectively, 2during the preceding calendar year. The Secretary of State 3shall, on or before April 15 of each year, transmit to the 4Department of Transportation a full and complete report 5showing the amount of motor vehicle license fees received from 6the residents of each county, respectively, during the 7preceding calendar year. The Department of Transportation 8shall, each month, use for allotment purposes the last such 9report received from the Secretary of State.10    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 11Department of Transportation shall allot to the several 12counties their share of the amount apportioned for the use of 13road districts. The allotment shall be apportioned among the 14several counties in the State in the proportion which the 15total mileage of township or district roads in the respective 16counties bears to the total mileage of all township and 17district roads in the State. Funds allotted to the respective 18counties for the use of road districts therein shall be 19allocated to the several road districts in the county in the 20proportion which the total mileage of such township or 21district roads in the respective road districts bears to the 22total mileage of all such township or district roads in the 23county. After July 1 of any year prior to 2011, no allocation 24shall be made for any road district unless it levied a tax for 25road and bridge purposes in an amount which will require the 26extension of such tax against the taxable property in any such   HB2613- 15 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1road district at a rate of not less than either .08% of the 2value thereof, based upon the assessment for the year 3immediately prior to the year in which such tax was levied and 4as equalized by the Department of Revenue or, in DuPage 5County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per mile of 6road under the jurisdiction of the road district, whichever is 7less. Beginning July 1, 2011 and each July 1 thereafter, an 8allocation shall be made for any road district if it levied a 9tax for road and bridge purposes. In counties other than 10DuPage County, if the amount of the tax levy requires the 11extension of the tax against the taxable property in the road 12district at a rate that is less than 0.08% of the value 13thereof, based upon the assessment for the year immediately 14prior to the year in which the tax was levied and as equalized 15by the Department of Revenue, then the amount of the 16allocation for that road district shall be a percentage of the 17maximum allocation equal to the percentage obtained by 18dividing the rate extended by the district by 0.08%. In DuPage 19County, if the amount of the tax levy requires the extension of 20the tax against the taxable property in the road district at a 21rate that is less than the lesser of (i) 0.08% of the value of 22the taxable property in the road district, based upon the 23assessment for the year immediately prior to the year in which 24such tax was levied and as equalized by the Department of 25Revenue, or (ii) a rate that will yield an amount equal to 26$12,000 per mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road   HB2613- 16 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1district, then the amount of the allocation for the road 2district shall be a percentage of the maximum allocation equal 3to the percentage obtained by dividing the rate extended by 4the district by the lesser of (i) 0.08% or (ii) the rate that 5will yield an amount equal to $12,000 per mile of road under 6the jurisdiction of the road district. 7    Prior to 2011, if any road district has levied a special 8tax for road purposes pursuant to Sections 6-601, 6-602, and 96-603 of the Illinois Highway Code, and such tax was levied in 10an amount which would require extension at a rate of not less 11than .08% of the value of the taxable property thereof, as 12equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue, or, in 13DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per 14mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road district, 15whichever is less, such levy shall, however, be deemed a 16proper compliance with this Section and shall qualify such 17road district for an allotment under this Section. Beginning 18in 2011 and thereafter, if any road district has levied a 19special tax for road purposes under Sections 6-601, 6-602, and 206-603 of the Illinois Highway Code, and the tax was levied in 21an amount that would require extension at a rate of not less 22than 0.08% of the value of the taxable property of that road 23district, as equalized or assessed by the Department of 24Revenue or, in DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater 25than $12,000 per mile of road under the jurisdiction of the 26road district, whichever is less, that levy shall be deemed a   HB2613- 17 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1proper compliance with this Section and shall qualify such 2road district for a full, rather than proportionate, allotment 3under this Section. If the levy for the special tax is less 4than 0.08% of the value of the taxable property, or, in DuPage 5County if the levy for the special tax is less than the lesser 6of (i) 0.08% or (ii) $12,000 per mile of road under the 7jurisdiction of the road district, and if the levy for the 8special tax is more than any other levy for road and bridge 9purposes, then the levy for the special tax qualifies the road 10district for a proportionate, rather than full, allotment 11under this Section. If the levy for the special tax is equal to 12or less than any other levy for road and bridge purposes, then 13any allotment under this Section shall be determined by the 14other levy for road and bridge purposes.15    Prior to 2011, if a township has transferred to the road 16and bridge fund money which, when added to the amount of any 17tax levy of the road district would be the equivalent of a tax 18levy requiring extension at a rate of at least .08%, or, in 19DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per 20mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road district, 21whichever is less, such transfer, together with any such tax 22levy, shall be deemed a proper compliance with this Section 23and shall qualify the road district for an allotment under 24this Section.25    In counties in which a property tax extension limitation 26is imposed under the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law,   HB2613- 18 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1road districts may retain their entitlement to a motor fuel 2tax allotment or, beginning in 2011, their entitlement to a 3full allotment if, at the time the property tax extension 4limitation was imposed, the road district was levying a road 5and bridge tax at a rate sufficient to entitle it to a motor 6fuel tax allotment and continues to levy the maximum allowable 7amount after the imposition of the property tax extension 8limitation. Any road district may in all circumstances retain 9its entitlement to a motor fuel tax allotment or, beginning in 102011, its entitlement to a full allotment if it levied a road 11and bridge tax in an amount that will require the extension of 12the tax against the taxable property in the road district at a 13rate of not less than 0.08% of the assessed value of the 14property, based upon the assessment for the year immediately 15preceding the year in which the tax was levied and as equalized 16by the Department of Revenue or, in DuPage County, an amount 17equal to or greater than $12,000 per mile of road under the 18jurisdiction of the road district, whichever is less.19    As used in this Section, the term "road district" means 20any road district, including a county unit road district, 21provided for by the Illinois Highway Code; and the term 22"township or district road" means any road in the township and 23district road system as defined in the Illinois Highway Code. 24For the purposes of this Section, "township or district road" 25also includes such roads as are maintained by park districts, 26forest preserve districts and conservation districts. The   HB2613- 19 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1Department of Transportation shall determine the mileage of 2all township and district roads for the purposes of making 3allotments and allocations of motor fuel tax funds for use in 4road districts.5    Payment of motor fuel tax moneys to municipalities and 6counties shall be made as soon as possible after the allotment 7is made. The treasurer of the municipality or county may 8invest these funds until their use is required and the 9interest earned by these investments shall be limited to the 10same uses as the principal funds.11(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 13    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 14changing Section 8-11-2.3 as follows: 15    (65 ILCS 5/8-11-2.3)16    Sec. 8-11-2.3. Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Law. 17Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any 18other tax that may be imposed, a municipality in a county with 19a population of over 3,000,000 inhabitants may also impose, by 20ordinance, a tax upon all persons engaged in the municipality 21in the business of selling motor fuel, as defined in the Motor 22Fuel Tax Law, at retail for the operation of motor vehicles 23upon public highways or for the operation of recreational 24watercraft upon waterways. The tax may be imposed, in one cent   HB2613- 20 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1increments, at a rate not to exceed $0.03 per gallon of motor 2fuel sold at retail within the municipality for the purpose of 3use or consumption and not for the purpose of resale. The tax 4may not be imposed under this Section on aviation fuel, as 5defined in Section 3 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.6    Persons subject to any tax imposed under the authority 7granted in this Section may reimburse themselves for their 8seller's tax liability hereunder by separately stating that 9tax as an additional charge, which charge may be stated in 10combination, in a single amount, with State tax which sellers 11are required to collect under the Use Tax Act, pursuant to such 12bracket schedules as the Department may prescribe. 13    A tax imposed pursuant to this Section, and all civil 14penalties that may be assessed as an incident thereof, shall 15be administered, collected, and enforced by the Department of 16Revenue in the same manner as the tax imposed under the 17Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, as now or hereafter amended, 18insofar as may be practicable; except that in the event of a 19conflict with the provisions of this Section, this Section 20shall control. The Department of Revenue shall have full power 21to: administer and enforce this Section; collect all taxes and 22penalties due hereunder; dispose of taxes and penalties so 23collected in the manner hereinafter provided; and determine 24all rights to credit memoranda arising on account of the 25erroneous payment of tax or penalty hereunder. 26    Whenever the Department determines that a refund shall be   HB2613- 21 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1made under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a 2credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 3Comptroller, who shall cause the order to be drawn for the 4amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 5from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 6Treasurer out of the Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Fund. 7    The Department shall immediately pay over to the State 8Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, all taxes and penalties 9collected under this Section. Those taxes and penalties shall 10be deposited into the Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Fund, a trust 11fund created in the State treasury. Moneys in the Municipal 12Motor Fuel Tax Fund shall be used to make payments to 13municipalities and for the payment of refunds under this 14Section. 15    On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 16Department shall prepare and certify to the State Comptroller 17the disbursement of stated sums of money to named 18municipalities for which taxpayers have paid taxes or 19penalties hereunder to the Department during the second 20preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to each 21municipality shall be the amount (not including credit 22memoranda) collected under this Section from retailers within 23the municipality during the second preceding calendar month by 24the Department, plus an amount the Department determines is 25necessary to offset amounts that were erroneously paid to a 26different municipality, and not including an amount equal to   HB2613- 22 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1the amount of refunds made during the second preceding 2calendar month by the Department on behalf of the 3municipality, and not including any amount that the Department 4determines is necessary to offset any amounts that were 5payable to a different municipality but were erroneously paid 6to the municipality, less 1.5% of the remainder, which the 7Department shall transfer into the Tax Compliance and 8Administration Fund. The Department, at the time of each 9monthly disbursement, shall prepare and certify to the State 10Comptroller the amount to be transferred into the Tax 11Compliance and Administration Fund under this Section. Within 1210 days after receipt by the Comptroller of the disbursement 13certification to the municipalities and the Tax Compliance and 14Administration Fund provided for in this Section to be given 15to the Comptroller by the Department, the Comptroller shall 16cause the orders to be drawn for the respective amounts in 17accordance with the directions contained in the certification.18    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize a 19municipality to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in 20any business which under the Constitution of the United States 21may not be made the subject of taxation by this State. 22    An ordinance or resolution imposing or discontinuing the 23tax under this Section or effecting a change in the rate 24thereof shall either: (i) be adopted and a certified copy 25thereof filed with the Department on or before the first day of 26April, whereupon the Department shall proceed to administer   HB2613- 23 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b1and enforce this Section as of the first day of July next 2following the adoption and filing; or (ii) be adopted and a 3certified copy thereof filed with the Department on or before 4the first day of October, whereupon the Department shall 5proceed to administer and enforce this Section as of the first 6day of January next following the adoption and filing. 7    An ordinance adopted in accordance with the provisions of 8this Section in effect before the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly shall be deemed 10to impose the tax in accordance with the provisions of this 11Section as amended by this amendatory Act of the 101st General 12Assembly and shall be administered by the Department of 13Revenue in accordance with the provisions of this Section as 14amended by this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly; 15provided that, on or before October 1, 2020, the municipality 16adopts and files a certified copy of a superseding ordinance 17that imposes the tax in accordance with the provisions of this 18Section as amended by this amendatory Act of the 101st General 19Assembly. If a superseding ordinance is not so adopted and 20filed, then the tax imposed in accordance with the provisions 21of this Section in effect before the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly shall be 23discontinued on January 1, 2021. 24    This Section shall be known and may be cited as the 25Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Law. 26    No tax may be imposed under this Section on or after July   HB2613- 24 -LRB104 10796 HLH 20877 b11, 2025. This is a denial and limitation under subsection (g) 2of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution of the 3power of a home rule municipality to impose a tax. 4(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 101-604, eff. 12-13-19.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.